Missouri, session 2026, SB966.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 160.661, to read as
follows:
160.661. 1. The department of elementary and
secondary education shall ensure that every public school
and public charter school located in any city not within a
county or any county with more than one million inhabitants
conducts an annual safety assessment of such public school
or public charter school pursuant to the provisions of this
section. The department of public safety, local emergency
services, and local law enforcement shall provide reasonable
assistance to public schools and public charter schools in
order to implement the provisions of this section.
2. The school safety assessments shall include, but
shall not be limited to, a consideration of each school
building's vulnerabilities to school shootings and
intruders, and shall include an assessment of each school's
implementation of the following safety procedures, policies,
and tools:

SB 966 2
(1) Access controls, including the safety of school
doors, locking devices, intercom or buzzer systems, and
vestibules;
(2) Video surveillance equipment used to monitor
school buildings and buses;
(3) Visitor management systems, including software
that records the usage of school facilities by visitors;
(4) Building security systems, including intruder
alarms and surveillance systems;
(5) Emergency communication tools, including safety
alert messaging systems;
(6) School safety procedures and policies, including
safety planning, vulnerability assessments, and staff
training;
(7) Bleeding control kits, including tourniquets,
bleeding control bandages, latex-free protective gloves,
permanent markers, and instructional documents developed by
the United States Department of Homeland Security's Stop the
Bleed national awareness campaign or the American College of
Surgeons Committee on Trauma, or both;
(8) Automated external defibrillators used to help
those experiencing sudden cardiac arrest;
(9) Fencing to secure playgrounds;
(10) Bollards to protect front entrances; and
(11) Safety film to prevent the shattering of glass in
doors, windows, and sidelights.
3. Each public school and public charter school that
conducts a safety assessment pursuant to the provisions of
this section shall provide an annual report of the findings
of such safety assessment to the department of elementary
and secondary education. Based upon the findings of the
safety assessments, the department of elementary and

SB 966 3
secondary education, in conjunction with the department of
public safety, shall:
(1) Provide to each public school and public charter
school an annual report summarizing such school's safety
vulnerabilities in the areas outlined in subsection 2 of
this section;
(2) Provide specific recommendations for mitigating
any such safety vulnerabilities; and
(3) Provide a copy of the report to the general
assembly.
4. Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 610 to the
contrary, a report created pursuant to subsection 3 of this
section shall not be considered a public record and shall
not be available for public examination.
5. The provisions of this section shall not be
construed to relieve any school district, public school, or
public charter school from the responsibility to maintain
school safety standards established in the Missouri school
improvement program or otherwise required by state or
federal law.
Section B. Section A of this act shall become
effective July 1, 2028.
✓